Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-727
Supreme Court; procedure; rule; adopt.

The Supreme Court shall by rule provide for procedure under sections 24-709, 24-712, and 24-715 to 24-728 before the Commission on Judicial Qualifications, the masters, and the Supreme Court.

Laws 1967, c. 141, § 13, p. 434;

Laws 1981, LB 475, § 13.